Louisiana, session 2026, SB384.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2211.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2211.3. Pilot Innovation Hub; creation; jurisdiction
A. The governing authority of a parish is hereby authorized to enact a
resolution designating the parish as a Pilot Innovation Hub.
B. The Pilot Innovation Hub designation shall permit the validation and
implementation of innovative technologies to address public challenges,
stimulate local economic activity, and create job opportunities. Local business
growth and technology commercialization is hereby recognized as a key
component to efficiently and safely address public challenges, an essential factor
in economic development, and a primary contributor to an all-of-government
approach to driving state economic competitiveness.
C.(1) Any political subdivision within the jurisdiction designated as a
Pilot Innovation Hub may do all of the following:
(a) Establish reasonable procedures governing the competitive selection
of the pilot innovation contractor.
(b) Enter into a contractual agreement with the pilot innovation
contractor for the purposes of directly managing the programming.
(c) Use public property and resources and align procedures including
permitting and zoning, to implement programming.
(2) Pilot innovation contractors, when and if authorized by a political
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 384 ENROLLED
subdivision with a Pilot Innovation Hub, shall do all of the following:
(a) Establish reasonable procedures governing the competitive selection
and vetting of program participants.
(b) Develop and implement programming.
(c) Define benchmarks and deployment metrics.
(d) Implement programming in a manner that does not adversely impact
the political subdivision or the health, safety, or welfare of the residents of the
parish.
D. Successful completion of programming shall be demonstrated by a
comprehensive pilot report, compiled by the pilot innovation contractor and
delivered to the parish governing authority or political subdivision. The
comprehensive pilot report shall:
(1) Provide performance data, roadmap for scaled deployment including
integration requirements and regulatory considerations.
(2) Demonstrate that usage of technology delivers a valid, useful public
purpose and address the goals outlined in the agreement.
E. Upon successful completion of programming through the Pilot
Innovation Hub, the parish governing authority or political subdivision may
award a sole-source contract to the innovator without competitive bidding,
provided both of the following occur:
(1) The parish shall give notice to the public of its intended sole-source
award and allow a thirty-day protest period.
(2) The business has dedicated operations in the state.
F. For the purposes of this Section:
(1) "Programming" means any activities related to the piloting and
validation of technologies intended to address public challenges located within
the jurisdictional boundaries of the Pilot Innovation Hub, including but not
limited to flooding, water management, subsidence, infrastructure challenges,
energy and grid resilience, maritime logistics, coastal restoration, and other
issues of significant public concern within the Pilot Innovation Hub.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 384 ENROLLED
(2) "Pilot innovation contractor" means an established business,
nongovernmental organization, or venture platform with demonstrated
experience in developing and managing pilot designed programs to validate
start-up technologies.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.